Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-2091
Receivership; receiver responsibility; successor appointed; when.

The receiver is responsible for the conduct of the health care facility during the receivership. The department may apply to the court for an order terminating the appointment of a receiver and appointing a successor receiver when violations of federal or state laws or regulations occur during the receivership or for other appropriate reasons.

Laws 1995, LB 406, § 67.